Washington statutes.
RCW 19.76.100

Labels on bottles, etc.—Filing—Publication.

All persons engaged in the manufacture, bottling or selling of ale, porter, lager beer, soda, mineral water, or other beverages in casks, kegs, bottles or boxes, with their names or other marks of ownership stamped or marked thereon, may file in the office of the secretary of state a description of names or marks so used by them, and publish the same in a newspaper of general circulation in the county, printed in the English language, once a week for six successive weeks, in counties where the articles are manufactured, bottled or sold.

[ 1985 c 469 s 11; 1981 c 302 s 1; 1897 c 38 s 1; RRS s 11546.]

NOTES:

Severability—1981 c 302: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1981 c 302 s 40.]

Alcoholic beverage control: Title 66 RCW.

Labeling of spirits, etc.: RCW 66.28.100 through 66.28.120.